Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6046
Council; certain members; limitation on service.

Any member of the council who is representative of a state or local governmental agency may serve only during his continuance as an officer or employee of such state or local agency. No member of the council shall serve more than two successive terms. For the purpose of this section, service for more than eighteen months of a full term shall be deemed service for the full term.

Laws 1967, c. 452, § 4, p. 1400;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 71-2034.